Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-333
Manufacturer; records.

Each manufacturer shall keep and maintain a complete set of records detailing the manufacturer's pickle card activities, including the name and state identification number of each distributor purchasing pickle card units, the quantity and type of each pickle card unit sold, and any other information concerning pickle card units which the department deems necessary. Such records shall be made available to the department upon request. The department may require by rule and regulation periodic reporting from a manufacturer relative to its pickle card activities.

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 26;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-143.05;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 99;

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 35;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 14.